Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.1986

Permanent increase for specified beneficiaries age seventy or over.

(1) The amount of the July 1, 1993, increase to the retirement allowance of beneficiaries under this chapter as a result of the temporary adjustment authorized by section 3, chapter 519, Laws of 1993, shall be made a permanent adjustment on July 1, 1995.

(2) Beneficiaries receiving a benefit under *RCW 41.40.198 who are at least age seventy-nine shall receive on July 1, 1995, a permanent adjustment of one dollar and eighteen cents per month per year of service.

(3) Beneficiaries under this chapter who are not subject to subsection (1) of this section and are not receiving a benefit under *RCW 41.40.198 shall receive the following permanent adjustment to their retirement allowance on July 1, 1995:

(a) Those who are age seventy, thirty-nine cents per month per year of service;

(b) Those who are age seventy-one, seventy-nine cents per month per year of service; and

(c) Those who are at least age seventy-two, one dollar and eighteen cents per month per year of service.

[ 1995 c 345 s 8.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 41.40.198 was repealed by 1995 c 345 s 11.

Intent—Effective date—1995 c 345: See notes following RCW 41.32.489.